California statutes. Revenue and Taxation Code
(III) Notwithstanding subclauses (I) and (II), if credits available under this subparagraph remain unallocated after the final California Debt Limit Allocation Committee round for qualified residential rental projects in a given calendar year, the California Tax Credit Allocation Committee may allocate some or all of the remaining credits for nonfederally subsidized buildings eligible for credits under Section 42 of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to low-income housing credit.

(2) The unused housing credit
 ceiling, if any, for the preceding calendar years.

(3) The amount of housing credit ceiling returned in the calendar year. For purposes of this paragraph, the amount of housing credit dollar amount returned in the calendar year equals the housing credit dollar amount previously allocated to any project that does not become a qualified low-income housing project within the period required by this section or to any project with respect to which an allocation is canceled by mutual consent of the California Tax Credit Allocation Committee and the allocation recipient.

(4) Five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000) per calendar year for projects to provide farmworker housing, as defined in subdivision (h) of Section 50199.7 of the Health and Safety Code.

(5) The amount of any unallocated or returned credits under former
 Sections 17053.14, 23608.2, and 23608.3, as those sections read prior to January 1, 2009, until fully exhausted for projects to provide farmworker housing, as defined in subdivision (h) of Section 50199.7 of the Health and Safety Code.

(h) The term “compliance period” as defined in Section 42(i)(1) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to compliance period, is modified to mean, with respect to any building, the period of 30 consecutive taxable years beginning with the first taxable year of the credit period with respect thereto.

(i) Section 42(j) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to recapture of credit, shall not be applicable and the following requirements of this section shall be set forth in a regulatory agreement between the California Tax Credit Allocation Committee and the housing sponsor, and the regulatory agreement shall be subordinated, when required, to any lien
 or encumbrance of any banks or other institutional lenders to the project. The regulatory agreement entered into pursuant to subdivision (f) of Section 50199.14 of the Health and Safety Code shall apply, provided that the agreement includes all of the following provisions:

(1) A term not less than the compliance period.

(2) A requirement that the agreement be recorded in the official records of the county in which the qualified low-income housing project is located.

(3) A provision stating which state and local agencies can enforce the regulatory agreement in the event the housing sponsor fails to satisfy any of the requirements of this section.

(4) A provision that the regulatory agreement shall be deemed a contract enforceable by tenants as
 third-party beneficiaries thereto and that allows individuals, whether prospective, present, or former occupants of the building, who meet the income limitation applicable to the building, the right to enforce the regulatory agreement in any state court.

(5) A provision incorporating the requirements of Section 42 of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to low-income housing credit, as modified by this section.

(6) A requirement that the housing sponsor notify the California Tax Credit Allocation Committee or its designee if there is a determination by the Internal Revenue Service that the project is not in compliance with Section 42(g) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to qualified low-income housing project.

(7) A requirement that the housing sponsor, as security for the performance of the housing sponsor’s
 obligations under the regulatory agreement, assign the housing sponsor’s interest in rents that it receives from the project, provided that until there is a default under the regulatory agreement, the housing sponsor is entitled to collect and retain the rents.

(8) A provision that the remedies available in the event of a default under the regulatory agreement that is not cured within a reasonable cure period include, but are not limited to, allowing any of the parties designated to enforce the regulatory agreement to collect all rents with respect to the project; taking possession of the project and operating the project in accordance with the regulatory agreement until the enforcer determines the housing sponsor is in a position to operate the project in accordance with the regulatory agreement; applying to any court for specific performance; securing the appointment of a receiver to operate the project; or any other relief as may be
 appropriate.

(j) (1) The committee shall allocate the housing credit on a regular basis consisting of two or more periods in each calendar year during which applications may be filed and considered. The committee shall establish application filing deadlines, the maximum percentage of federal and state low-income housing tax credit ceiling that may be allocated by the committee in that period, and the approximate date on which allocations shall be made. If the enactment of federal or state law, the adoption of rules or regulations, or other similar events prevent the use of two allocation periods, the committee may reduce the number of periods and adjust the filing deadlines, maximum percentage of credit allocated, and the allocation dates.

(2) The committee shall adopt a qualified allocation plan, as provided in Section 42(m)(1) of the Internal Revenue Code,
 relating to plans for allocation of credit among projects. In adopting this plan, the committee shall comply with the provisions of Sections 42(m)(1)(B) and 42(m)(1)(C) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to qualified allocation plan and relating to certain selection criteria must be used, respectively.

(3) Notwithstanding Section 42(m) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to responsibilities of housing credit agencies, the California Tax Credit Allocation Committee shall allocate housing credits in accordance with the qualified allocation plan and regulations, which shall include the following provisions:

(A) All housing sponsors, as defined by paragraph (3) of subdivision (a), shall demonstrate at the time the application is filed with the committee that the project meets the following threshold requirements:

(i) The housing sponsor shall demonstrate that there is a need and demand for low-income housing in the community or region for which it is proposed.

(ii) The project’s proposed financing, including tax credit proceeds, shall be sufficient to complete the project and that the proposed operating income shall be adequate to operate the project for the extended use period.

(iii) The project shall have enforceable financing commitments, either construction or permanent financing, for at least 50 percent of the total estimated financing of the project.

(iv) The housing sponsor shall have and maintain control of the site for the project.

(v) The housing sponsor shall demonstrate that the project complies with all applicable local land use and
 zoning ordinances.

(vi) The housing sponsor shall demonstrate that the project development team has the experience and the financial capacity to ensure project completion and operation for the extended use period.

(vii) The housing sponsor shall demonstrate the amount of tax credit that is necessary for the financial feasibility of the project and its viability as a qualified low-income housing project throughout the extended use period, taking into account operating expenses, a supportable debt service, reserves, funds set aside for rental subsidies and required equity, and a development fee that does not exceed a specified percentage of the eligible basis of the project prior to inclusion of the development fee in the eligible basis, as determined by the committee.

(B) The committee shall give a preference to those
 projects satisfying all of the threshold requirements of subparagraph (A) if both of the following apply:

(i) The project serves the lowest income tenants at rents affordable to those tenants.

(ii) The project is obligated to serve qualified tenants for the longest period.

(C) In addition to the provisions of subparagraphs (A) and (B), the committee shall use the following criteria in allocating housing credits:

(i) Projects serving large families in which a substantial number, as defined by the committee, of all residential units are low-income units with three or more bedrooms.

(ii) Projects providing single-room occupancy units serving very low income tenants.

(iii) Existing projects that are “at risk of conversion,” as defined by paragraph (6) of subdivision (c).

(iv) Projects for which a public agency provides direct or indirect long-term financial support for at least 15 percent of the total project development costs or projects for which the owner’s equity constitutes at least 30 percent of the total project development costs.

(v) Projects that provide tenant amenities not generally available to residents of low-income housing projects.

(4) For purposes of allocating credits pursuant to this section, the committee shall not give preference to any project by virtue of the date of submission of its application.

(D) Subparagraphs (B) and (C) shall
 not apply to projects receiving an allocation pursuant to subparagraph (B) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (g).

(k) Section 42(l) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to certifications and other reports to secretary, shall be modified as follows:

The term “secretary” shall be replaced by the term “Franchise Tax Board.”

(l) In the case in which the credit allowed under this section exceeds the “net tax,” the excess may be carried over to reduce the “net tax” in the following year, and succeeding years, if necessary, until the credit has been exhausted.

(m) A project that received an allocation of a 1989 federal housing credit dollar amount shall be eligible to receive an allocation of a 1990 state housing credit dollar amount, subject to all of the following
 conditions:

(1) The project was not placed in service prior to 1990.

(2) To the extent the amendments made to this section by the Statutes of 1990 conflict with any provisions existing in this section prior to those amendments, the prior provisions of law shall prevail.

(3) Notwithstanding paragraph (2), a project applying for an allocation under this subdivision shall be subject to the requirements of paragraph (3) of subdivision (j).

(n) The credit period with respect to an allocation of credit in 1989 by the California Tax Credit Allocation Committee of which any amount is attributable to unallocated credit from 1987 or 1988 shall not begin until after December 31, 1989.

(o) The
 provisions of Section 11407(a) of Public Law 101-508, relating to the effective date of the extension of the low-income housing credit, apply to calendar years after 1989.

(p) The provisions of Section 11407(c) of Public Law 101-508, relating to election to accelerate credit, shall not apply.

(q) (1) (A) For a project that receives a preliminary reservation under this section beginning on or after January 1, 2016, a taxpayer may elect, in the manner prescribed by the California Tax Credit Allocation Committee, to sell all or any portion of any credit allowed, subject to
 subparagraph (B). The taxpayer may make the election to sell pursuant to this subdivision at any time before the California Tax Credit Allocation Committee allocates a final credit amount for the project pursuant to this section, at which point the election shall become irrevocable.

(B) A credit that a taxpayer elects to sell all or a portion of pursuant to this subdivision shall be sold for consideration that is not less than 80 percent of the amount of the credit.

(2) (A) The taxpayer that originally received the credit shall report to the California Tax Credit Allocation Committee within 10 days of the sale of the credit, in the form and manner specified by the California Tax Credit Allocation Committee, all required information regarding the purchase and sale of the credit, including the social security or other taxpayer identification number of the unrelated party or parties to whom the credit has been sold, the face amount of the credit sold, and the amount of consideration received by the taxpayer for the sale of the credit.

(B) The California Tax Credit Allocation Committee shall provide an annual listing to the Franchise Tax Board, in a form and manner agreed upon by the California Tax Credit Allocation Committee and the Franchise Tax Board, of the taxpayers that have sold or purchased a credit pursuant to this
 subdivision.

(3) A credit may be sold pursuant to this subdivision to more than one unrelated party.

(4) Notwithstanding any other law, the taxpayer that originally received the credit that is sold pursuant to paragraph (1) shall remain solely liable for all obligations and liabilities imposed on the taxpayer by this section with respect to the credit, none of which shall apply to a party to whom the credit has been sold or subsequently transferred. Parties that purchase credits pursuant to paragraph (1) shall be entitled to utilize the purchased credits in the same manner in which the taxpayer that originally received the credit could utilize them.

(5) A taxpayer shall not sell a credit allowed by this section if the taxpayer was allowed the credit on any tax return of the taxpayer.

(r) The California Tax Credit Allocation Committee may prescribe rules, guidelines, or procedures necessary or appropriate to carry out the purposes of this section, including any guidelines regarding the allocation of the credit allowed under this section. Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code shall not apply to any rule, guideline, or procedure prescribed by the California Tax Credit Allocation Committee pursuant to this section.

(s) The amendments to this section made by Chapter 1222 of the Statutes of 1993 apply only to taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 1994.

(t) This section shall remain in effect on and after December 1, 1990, for as long as Section 42 of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to low-income housing credit, remains in effect.
 Any unused credit may continue to be carried forward, as provided in subdivision (l), until the credit has been exhausted.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 492, Sec. 2.   (AB 480)   Effective January 1, 2026.   Section conditionally inoperative pursuant to subd. (t).)
-------------------------------------------

17059.2.

(a) (1) For each taxable year beginning on and after January 1, 2014, and before January 1, 2035, there shall be allowed as a credit against the “net tax,” as defined in Section 17039, an amount as determined by the committee pursuant to paragraph (2) and approved pursuant to Section 18410.2.

(2) The credit under this section shall be allocated by GO-Biz with respect to the 2013–14 fiscal year through and including the 2032–33 fiscal year. The amount of credit allocated to a taxpayer with respect to a fiscal year pursuant to this section shall be as set forth in a written agreement between GO-Biz and the taxpayer and shall be based on the following factors:

(A) The number of jobs the taxpayer will create or retain in this state.

(B) The compensation paid or proposed to be paid by the taxpayer to its employees, including wages and fringe benefits.

(C) The amount of investment in this state by the taxpayer.

(D) The extent of unemployment or poverty in the area according to the United States Census in
 which the taxpayer’s project or business is proposed or located.

(E) The incentives available to the taxpayer in this state, including incentives from the state, local government, and other entities.

(F) The incentives available to the taxpayer in other states.

(G) The duration of the proposed project and the duration the taxpayer commits to remain in this state.

(H) The overall economic impact in this state of the taxpayer’s project or business.

(I) The strategic importance of the taxpayer’s project or business to the state, region, or locality.

(J) The opportunity for future growth and expansion in this state by the
 taxpayer’s business.

(K) The extent to which the anticipated benefit to the state exceeds the projected benefit to the taxpayer from the tax credit.

(L) For a credit allocated beginning with the 2018–19 fiscal year, the training opportunities offered by the taxpayer to its employees.

(3) The written agreement entered into pursuant to paragraph (2) shall include:

(A) Terms and conditions that include the taxable year or years for which the credit allocated shall be allowed, a minimum compensation level, and a minimum job retention period.

(B) Provisions indicating whether the credit is to be allocated in full upon approval or in increments based on mutually agreed upon milestones when
 satisfactorily met by the taxpayer.

(C) Provisions that allow the committee to recapture the credit, in whole or in part, if the taxpayer fails to fulfill the terms and conditions of the written agreement.

(b) For purposes of this section:

(1) “Committee” means the California Competes Tax Credit Committee established pursuant to Section 18410.2.

(2) “GO-Biz” means the Governor’s Office of Business and Economic Development.

(c) For purposes of this section, GO-Biz shall do the following:

(1) Give priority to a taxpayer whose project or business is located or proposed to be located in an area of high unemployment or
 poverty.

(2) Negotiate with a taxpayer the terms and conditions of proposed written agreements that provide the credit allowed pursuant to this section to a taxpayer.

(3) Provide the negotiated written agreement to the committee for its approval pursuant to Section 18410.2.

(4) Inform the Franchise Tax Board of the terms and conditions of the written agreement upon approval of the written agreement by the committee.

(5) Inform the Franchise Tax Board of any recapture, in whole or in part, of a previously allocated credit upon approval of the recapture by the committee.

(6) Post on its internet website all of the following:

(A) The name of each taxpayer allocated a credit pursuant to this section.

(B) The estimated amount of the investment by each taxpayer.

(C) The estimated number of jobs created or retained.

(D) The amount of the credit allocated to the taxpayer.

(E) The amount of the credit recaptured from the taxpayer, if applicable.

(F) The primary location where the taxpayer has committed to increasing the net number of jobs or make investments. The primary location shall be listed by city or, in the case of unincorporated areas, by county.

(G) Information that identifies each tax credit award that was given a priority for
 being located in a high unemployment or poverty area, pursuant to paragraph (1).

(7) Consider the extent to which the credit will influence the taxpayer’s ability, willingness, or both, to create jobs in this state that might not otherwise be created in the state by the taxpayer or any other taxpayer. GO-Biz may also consider other factors, including, but not limited to, the following:

(A) The financial solvency of the taxpayer and the taxpayer’s ability to finance its proposed expansion.

(B) The taxpayer’s current and prior compliance with federal and state laws.

(C) Current and prior litigation involving the taxpayer.

(D) The reasonableness of the fee arrangement between the taxpayer and
 any third party providing any services related to the credit allowed pursuant to this section.

(E) For allocation periods beginning with the 2023–24 fiscal year, the taxpayer’s willingness to relocate jobs into California from a state that has enacted a law that does any of the following:

(i) Voids or repeals, or has the effect of voiding or repealing, existing state protections against discrimination on the basis of sexual orientation, gender identity, or gender expression.

(ii) Authorizes or requires discrimination against same-sex couples or their families, or discrimination on the basis of sexual orientation, gender identity, or gender expression.

(iii) Creates an exemption to antidiscrimination laws in order to permit discrimination against
 same-sex couples or their families, or permits discrimination on the basis of sexual orientation, gender identity, or gender expression.

(iv) Denies or interferes with, or has the effect of denying or interfering with, a woman’s right to choose to bear a child or to choose and obtain an abortion, as provided by Article 2.5 (commencing with Section 123460) of Chapter 2 of Part 2 of Division 106 of the Health and Safety Code.

(F) For allocation periods beginning with the 2023–24 fiscal year, the taxpayer’s commitment to treating their workforce fairly and creating quality, full-time, wage and salary jobs in the state, evidence of which may include, but not be limited to, the following:

(i) Training, career ladder, apprenticeship, and preapprenticeship programs for nonsupervisorial employees.

(ii) Joint labor-management letter of support.

(iii) A high percentage of full-time wage and salary employees compared to part-time, temporary, and independent contractors.

(iv) Little to no history of a bad safety record, or resolved or pending litigation, violations, citations, fines, or penalties relating to any state or federal environmental and labor laws within the last 10 years.

(G) Any other factors GO-Biz deems necessary to ensure that the administration of the credit allowed pursuant to this section is a model of accountability and transparency and that the effective use of the limited amount of credit available is maximized.

(8) (A) Implementation of
 subparagraphs (E) and (F) of paragraph (7) of this subdivision for the 2022–23 fiscal year is deemed an emergency and necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, and safety, or general welfare and, therefore, the Governor’s Office of Business and Economic Development is hereby authorized to adopt emergency regulations to implement subparagraphs (E) and (F) of paragraph (7) of this subdivision during the 2022–23 fiscal year in accordance with the rulemaking provisions of the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code).

(B) Nothing in this subdivision shall require the Governor’s Office of Business and Economic Development to approve emergency regulations.

(d) For purposes of this section, the Franchise Tax Board shall do all of the following:

(1) (A) Except as provided in subparagraph (B), review the books and records of all taxpayers allocated a credit pursuant to this section to ensure compliance with the terms and conditions of the written agreement between the taxpayer and GO-Biz.

(B) In the case of a taxpayer that is a “small business,” as defined in Section 17053.73, review the books and records of the taxpayer allocated a credit pursuant to this section to ensure compliance with the terms and conditions of the written agreement between the taxpayer and GO-Biz when, in the sole discretion of the Franchise Tax Board, a review of those books and records is appropriate or necessary in the best interests of the state.

(2) Notwithstanding Section 19542, notify GO-Biz of a possible breach of the written agreement by a taxpayer and
 provide detailed information regarding the basis for that determination.

(e) In the case where the credit allowed under this section exceeds the “net tax,” as defined in Section 17039, for a taxable year, the excess credit may be carried over to reduce the “net tax” in the following taxable year, and succeeding five taxable years, if necessary, until the credit has been exhausted.

(f) Any recapture, in whole or in part, of a credit approved by the committee pursuant to Section 18410.2 shall be treated as a mathematical error appearing on the return. Any amount of tax resulting from that recapture shall be assessed by the Franchise Tax Board in the same manner as provided by Section 19051. The amount of tax resulting from the recapture shall be added to the tax otherwise due by the taxpayer for the taxable year in which the committee’s recapture determination occurred.

(g) (1) The aggregate amount of credit that may be allocated in any fiscal year pursuant to this section and Section 23689 shall be an amount equal to the sum of subparagraphs (A), (B), and (C), less the amount specified in subparagraphs (D) and (E):

(A) Thirty million dollars ($30,000,000) for the 2013–14 fiscal year, one hundred fifty million dollars ($150,000,000) for the 2014–15 fiscal year, two hundred million dollars ($200,000,000) for each fiscal year from 2015–16 to 2017–18, inclusive, one hundred eighty million dollars ($180,000,000) for each fiscal year from 2018–19 to 2020–21, inclusive, two hundred ninety million dollars ($290,000,000) for the 2021–22 fiscal year, and one hundred eighty million dollars ($180,000,000) for each fiscal year from 2022–23 to 2032–33, inclusive.

(B) The unallocated credit amount, if any, from the preceding fiscal year.

(C) The amount of any previously allocated credits that have been recaptured.

(D) The amount estimated by the Director of Finance, in consultation with the Franchise Tax Board and the California Department of Tax and Fee Administration, to be necessary to limit the aggregation of the estimated amount of exemptions claimed pursuant to Section 6377.1 and of the amounts estimated to be claimed pursuant to this section and Sections 17053.73, 23626, and 23689 to no more than seven hundred fifty million dollars ($750,000,000) for either the current fiscal year
 or the next fiscal year.

(i) The Director of Finance shall notify the Chairperson of the Joint Legislative Budget Committee of the estimated annual allocation authorized by this paragraph. Any allocation pursuant to these provisions shall be made no sooner than 30 days after written notification has been provided to the Chairperson of the Joint Legislative Budget Committee and the chairpersons of the committees of each house of the Legislature that consider appropriations, or not sooner than whatever lesser time the Chairperson of the Joint Legislative Budget Committee, or the Chairperson’s designee, may determine.

(ii) In no event shall the amount estimated in this subparagraph be less than zero dollars ($0).

(E) (i) For the 2015–16 fiscal year and each fiscal year thereafter, the amount of
 credit estimated by the Director of Finance to be allowed to all qualified taxpayers for that fiscal year pursuant to subparagraph (A) or subparagraph (B) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (c) of Section 23636.

(ii) If the amount available per fiscal year pursuant to this section and Section 23689 is less than the aggregate amount of credit estimated by the Director of Finance to be allowed to qualified taxpayers pursuant to subparagraph (A) or subparagraph (B) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (c) of Section 23636, the aggregate amount allowed pursuant to Section 23636 shall not be reduced and, in addition to the reduction required by clause (i), the aggregate amount of credit that may be allocated pursuant to this section and Section 23689 for the next fiscal year shall be reduced by the amount of that deficit.

(iii) It is the intent of the Legislature that the reductions specified
 in this subparagraph of the aggregate amount of credit that may be allocated pursuant to this section and Section 23689 shall continue if the repeal dates of the credits allowed by this section and Section 23689 are removed or extended.

(2) (A) In addition to the other amounts determined pursuant to paragraph (1), the Director of Finance may increase the aggregate amount of credit that may be allocated pursuant to this section and Section 23689 by up to twenty-five million dollars ($25,000,000) per fiscal year through the 2032–33 fiscal year. The amount of any increase made pursuant to this paragraph, when combined with any increase made pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (g) of Section 23689, shall not exceed twenty-five million dollars ($25,000,000) per fiscal year through the 2032–33 fiscal year.

(B) It is the intent of the Legislature that the Director of Finance increase the aggregate amount under subparagraph (A) in order to mitigate the reduction of the amount available due to the credit allowed to all qualified taxpayers pursuant to subparagraph (A) or (B) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (c) of Section 23636.

(3) Each fiscal year through the 2017–18 fiscal year, 25 percent of the aggregate amount of the credit that may be allocated pursuant to this section and Section 23689 shall be reserved for small business, as defined in Section 17053.73 or 23626.

(4) Each fiscal year, no more than 20 percent of the aggregate
 amount of the credit that may be allocated pursuant to this section shall be allocated to any one taxpayer.

(h) GO-Biz may prescribe rules and regulations as necessary to carry out the purposes of this section. Any rule or regulation prescribed pursuant to this section may be by adoption of an emergency regulation in accordance with Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code.

(i) A written agreement between GO-Biz and a taxpayer with respect to the credit authorized by this section shall comply with existing law on the date the agreement is executed.

(j) (1) The
 Department of Finance shall estimate the total dollar amount of credits that will be claimed under this section with respect to each fiscal year from the 2013–14 fiscal year to the 2034–35 fiscal year, inclusive.

(2) The Franchise Tax Board shall annually provide to the Joint Legislative Budget Committee, by no later than March 1, a report of the total dollar amount of the credits claimed under this section with respect to the relevant fiscal year. The report shall compare the total dollar amount of credits claimed under this section with respect to that fiscal year with the department’s estimate with respect to that same fiscal year. If the total dollar amount of credits claimed for the fiscal year is less than the estimate for that fiscal year, the report shall identify options for increasing annual claims of the credit so as to meet estimated amounts.

(k) (1) Section 19542 shall apply to all information obtained by the Franchise Tax Board and GO-Biz for the purpose of administering the California Competes Tax Credit established under this section.

(2) Notwithstanding Section 19542 and paragraph (1), the Franchise Tax Board may disclose information to GO-Biz and GO-Biz may disclose information to the Franchise Tax Board for administration of the California Competes Tax Credit established under this section.

(l) This section shall remain in effect only until December 1, 2035, and as of that date is repealed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2026, Ch. 85, Sec. 2.   (SB 180)   Effective July 13, 2026.   Repealed as of December 1, 2035, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

17061.

(a) In the case of a person entitled to a refund pursuant to Section 1176 of the Unemployment Insurance Code, there shall be a credit against the tax imposed under this part in the amount of such refund. If the tax due after deduction of any other credit under this part is less than the credit allowable pursuant to this section, the difference shall be a tax refund.

(b) If the Franchise Tax Board disallows the refund or credit provided for by this section, the Franchise Tax Board shall notify the claimant accordingly. The Franchise Tax Board’s
 action upon the credit or refund is final unless the claimant files a protest with the Director of Employment Development pursuant to Section 1176.5 of the Unemployment Insurance Code. None of the remedies provided by this part shall be available to such claimant.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1252.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2.1. Alternative Minimum Tax [17062. - 17063.]

17062.

(a) In addition to the other taxes imposed by this part, there is hereby imposed for each taxable year, a tax equal to the excess, if any, of:

(1) The tentative minimum tax for the taxable year, over

(2) The regular tax for the taxable year.

(b) For purposes of this chapter, each of the following applies:

(1) The tentative minimum tax shall be computed in accordance with Sections 55 to 59, inclusive, of the Internal Revenue Code, except as otherwise provided in this part.

(2) The regular tax shall be the amount of tax imposed by Section 17041 or 17048, before reduction for any credits against the tax, less any amount imposed under paragraph (1) of subdivision (d) and paragraph (1) of subdivision (e) of Section 17560.

(3) (A) The provisions of Section 55(b)(1) of the Internal Revenue Code shall be modified to provide that the tentative minimum tax for the taxable year shall be equal to the following percent of so much of the alternative minimum taxable income for the taxable year as exceeds the exemption amount, before reduction for any credits against the tax:

(i) For any taxable year beginning on or after January 1, 1991, and before January 1, 1996, 8.5 percent.

(ii) For any taxable year beginning on or after January 1, 1996, and before January 1, 2009, 7 percent.

(iii) For taxable years beginning on and after January 1, 2009, and before January 1, 2011, 7.25 percent.

(iv) For any taxable year beginning on or after January 1, 2011, 7 percent.

(B) In the case of a nonresident or part-year resident, the tentative minimum tax shall be computed by multiplying the alternative minimum taxable income of the nonresident or part-year resident, as defined in subparagraph (C), by a rate (expressed as a percentage) equal to the tax computed under subdivision (b) on the alternative minimum taxable income of the nonresident or part-year
 resident as if the nonresident or part-year resident were a resident of this state for the taxable year and as if the nonresident or part-year resident were a resident of this state for all prior taxable years for any carryover items, deferred income, suspended losses, or suspended deductions, divided by the amount of that income.

(C) For purposes of this section, the term “alternative minimum taxable income of a nonresident or part-year resident” includes each of the following:

(i) For any period during which the taxpayer was a resident of this state (as defined by Section 17014), all items of alternative minimum taxable income (as modified for purposes of this chapter), regardless of source.

(ii) For any period during
 which the taxpayer was not a resident of this state, alternative minimum taxable income (as modified for purposes of this chapter) which were derived from sources within this state, determined in accordance with Article 9 of Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 17301) and Chapter 11 (commencing with Section 17951).

(iii) For purposes of computing “alternative minimum taxable income of a nonresident or part-year resident,” any carryover items, deferred income, suspended losses, or suspended deductions shall only be allowable to the extent that the carryover item, suspended loss, or suspended deduction was derived from sources within this state.

(4) The provisions of Section 55(b)(2) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to alternative minimum taxable income, shall be modified
 to provide that alternative minimum taxable income shall not include the income, adjustments, and items of tax preference attributable to any trade or business of a qualified taxpayer.

(A) For purposes of this paragraph, “qualified taxpayer” means a taxpayer who meets both of the following:

(i) Is the owner of, or has an ownership interest in, a trade or business.

(ii) Has aggregate gross receipts, less returns and allowances, of less than one million dollars ($1,000,000) during the taxable year from all trades or businesses of which the taxpayer is the owner or has an ownership interest, in the amount of that taxpayer’s proportionate interest in each trade or business.

(B) For purposes of this paragraph, “aggregate gross receipts, less returns and allowances” means the sum of the gross receipts of the trades or businesses that the taxpayer owns and the proportionate interest of the gross receipts of the trades or businesses that the taxpayer owns and of pass-through entities in which the taxpayer holds an interest.

(C) For purposes of this paragraph, “gross receipts, less returns and allowances” means the sum of the gross receipts from the production of business income, as defined in subdivision (a) of Section 25120, and the gross receipts from the production of nonbusiness income, as defined in subdivision (d) of Section 25120.

(D) For purposes of this paragraph, “proportionate interest” means:

(i) In the case of a pass-through entity that reports a profit for the taxable year, the taxpayer’s profit interest in the entity at the end of the taxpayer’s taxable year.

(ii) In the case of a pass-through entity that reports a loss for the taxable year, the taxpayer’s loss interest in the entity at the end of the taxpayer’s taxable year.

(iii) In the case of a pass-through entity that is sold or liquidates during the taxable year, the taxpayer’s capital account interest in the entity at the time of the sale or liquidation.

(E) (i) For purposes of this paragraph, “proportionate interest” includes an interest in a pass-through entity.

(ii) For purposes of this paragraph, “pass-through entity” means any of the following:

(I) A partnership, as defined by Section 17008.

(II) An “S” corporation, as provided in Chapter 4.5 (commencing with Section 23800) of Part 11.

(III) A regulated investment company, as provided in Section 24871.

(IV) A real estate investment trust, as provided in Section 24872.

(V) A real estate mortgage investment conduit, as provided in Section 24874.

(5) For taxable years beginning on
 or after January 1, 1998, Section 55(d)(1) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to exemption amount for taxpayers other than corporations is modified, for purposes of this part, to provide the following exemption amounts in lieu of those contained therein:

(A) Fifty-seven thousand two hundred sixty dollars ($57,260) in the case of either of the following:

(i) A joint return.

(ii) A surviving spouse.

(B) Forty-two thousand nine hundred forty-five dollars ($42,945) in the case of an individual who is both of the following:

(i) Not a married individual.

(ii) Not a surviving spouse.

(C) Twenty-eight thousand six hundred thirty dollars ($28,630) in the case of either of the following:

(i) A married individual who files a separate return.

(ii) An estate or trust.

(6) For taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 1998, Section 55(d)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to phaseout of exemption amount, is modified, for purposes of this part, to provide the following phaseout of exemption amounts in lieu of those contained therein:

(A) Two hundred fourteen thousand seven hundred twenty-five dollars ($214,725) in the case of a taxpayer
 described in subparagraph (A) of paragraph (5).

(B) One hundred sixty-one thousand forty-four dollars ($161,044) in the case of a taxpayer described in subparagraph (B) of paragraph (5).

(C) One hundred seven thousand three hundred sixty-two dollars ($107,362) in the case of a taxpayer described in subparagraph (C) of paragraph (5).
